Utah statutes.
59-12-352.    Transient room tax authority for municipalities and military
installation development authority -- Purposes for which revenues may be used.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), the governing body of a
municipality may impose a tax of not to exceed 1% on charges for the
accommodations and services described in Subsection 59-12-103(1)(i).
(b)  Subject to Section 63H-1-203, the military installation development
authority created in Section 63H-1-201 may impose a tax under this section for
accommodations and services described in Subsection 59-12-103(1)(i) within a
project area described in a project area plan adopted by the authority under
Title 63H, Chapter 1, Military Installation Development Authority Act, as
though the authority were a municipality.
(2)  Subject to the limitations of Subsection (1), a governing body of a
municipality may, by ordinance, increase or decrease the tax under this part.
(3)  A governing body of a municipality shall regulate the tax under this part
by ordinance.
(4)  A municipality may use revenues generated by the tax under this part for
general fund purposes.
(5) (a)  A municipality may not impose a tax under this section for
accommodations and services described in Subsection 59-12-103(1)(i) within a
project area described in a project area plan adopted by the authority under
Title 63H, Chapter 1, Military Installation Development Authority Act.
(b)  Subsection (5)(a) does not apply to the military installation development
authority's imposition of a tax under this section.
